italian_verbs.lexc
LEXICON Irregular_AbsolutePast
Irregular_AbsolutePast_Are ;
Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ere ;
Irregular_AbsolutePast_Ire ;
Irregular_AbsolutePast_Isc ;


LEXICON Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are
Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group1_Stems ;    ! Verbs inflected like 'dare'
Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group2_Stems ;    ! Verbs inflected like 'stare'

! ANDARE
andare+Ind+Pres+1Sg:vado	# ;
andare+Ind+Pres+2Sg:vai		# ;
andare+Ind+Pres+3Sg:va		# ;
andare+Ind+Pres+1Pl:andiamo	# ;
andare+Ind+Pres+2Pl:andate	# ;
andare+Ind+Pres+3Pl:vanno	# ;

andare+Ind+Past:and	Indicative_Imperfect_Are ;
andare+Ind+AbsPast:and	Indicative_AbsolutePast_Are ;

andare+Ind+Fut+1Sg:andrò	# ;
andare+Ind+Fut+2Sg:andrai	# ;
andare+Ind+Fut+3Sg:andrà	# ;
andare+Ind+Fut+1Pl:andremo	# ;
andare+Ind+Fut+2Pl:andrete	# ;
andare+Ind+Fut+3Pl:andranno	# ;

andare+Sub+Pres+1Sg:vada	# ;
andare+Sub+Pres+2Sg:vada	# ;
andare+Sub+Pres+3Sg:vada	# ;
andare+Sub+Pres+1Pl:andiamo	# ;	
andare+Sub+Pres+2Pl:andiate	# ;
andare+Sub+Pres+3Pl:vadano	# ;

andare+Sub+Past+1Sg:andassi		# ;
andare+Sub+Past+2Sg:andassi		# ;
andare+Sub+Past+3Sg:andasse		# ;
andare+Sub+Past+1Pl:andassimo	# ;
andare+Sub+Past+2Pl:andaste		# ;
andare+Sub+Past+3Pl:andassero	# ;

andare+Cond+Pres+1Sg:andrei			# ;
andare+Cond+Pres+2Sg:andresti		# ;
andare+Cond+Pres+3Sg:andrebbe		# ;
andare+Cond+Pres+1Pl:andremmo		# ;
andare+Cond+Pres+2Pl:andreste		# ;
andare+Cond+Pres+3Pl:andrebbero		# ;

andare+Imp+2Sg:va'			# ;
andare+Imp+2Sg:vai			# ;
andare+Imp+3Sg:vada			# ;
andare+Imp+1Pl:andiamo		# ;
andare+Imp+2Pl:andate		# ;
andare+Imp+3Pl:vadano		# ;

andare+Part:and			Participle_Are ;
andare+Ger:andando							# ;
andare+Inf:andare							# ;



LEXICON Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group1_Stems    ! Verbs inflected like 'dare'
dare:					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group1_Endings ;
disdare:dis				Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group1_Endings ;
ridare:ri				Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group1_Endings ;
sdare:s					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group1_Endings ;

LEXICON Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group1_Endings  ! Verbs inflected like 'dare'
+Ind+Pres+1Sg:do	# ;
+Ind+Pres+2Sg:dai		# ;
+Ind+Pres+3Sg:da		# ;
+Ind+Pres+1Pl:diamo	# ;
+Ind+Pres+2Pl:date	# ;
+Ind+Pres+3Pl:danno	# ;

+Ind+Past:dav	Indicative_Imperfect_Are ;

+Ind+AbsPast+1Sg:detti	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+2Sg:desti	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+3Sg:dette	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+3Sg:diede	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+3Sg:dètte	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+1Pl:demmo	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+2Pl:deste	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+3Pl:diedero	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+3Pl:dettero	# ;

+Ind+Fut+1Sg:darò	# ;
+Ind+Fut+2Sg:drai	# ;
+Ind+Fut+3Sg:darà	# ;
+Ind+Fut+1Pl:daremo	# ;
+Ind+Fut+2Pl:darete	# ;
+Ind+Fut+3Pl:daranno	# ;

+Sub+Pres+1Sg:dia	# ;
+Sub+Pres+2Sg:dia	# ;
+Sub+Pres+3Sg:dia	# ;
+Sub+Pres+1Pl:diamo	# ;	
+Sub+Pres+2Pl:diate	# ;
+Sub+Pres+3Pl:diano	# ;

+Sub+Past+1Sg:dessi		# ;
+Sub+Past+2Sg:dessi		# ;
+Sub+Past+3Sg:desse		# ;
+Sub+Past+1Pl:dessimo	# ;
+Sub+Past+2Pl:deste		# ;
+Sub+Past+3Pl:dessero	# ;

+Cond+Pres+1Sg:darei			# ;
+Cond+Pres+2Sg:daresti		# ;
+Cond+Pres+3Sg:darebbe		# ;
+Cond+Pres+1Pl:daremmo		# ;
+Cond+Pres+2Pl:dareste		# ;
+Cond+Pres+3Pl:darebbero		# ;
+Part:d			Participle_Are ;
+Ger:dando							# ;
+Inf:dare							# ;

LEXICON Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group2_Stems    ! Verbs inflected like 'stare'
stare:							Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group2_Endings ;
antistare:anti					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group2_Endings ;
ristare:ri						Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group2_Endings ;
soprastare:sopra				Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group2_Endings ;
sottostare:sotto				Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group2_Endings ;

LEXICON Highly_Irregular_Forms_Are_Group2_Endings  ! Verbs inflected like 'stare'
+Ind+Pres+1Sg:sto	# ;
+Ind+Pres+2Sg:stai		# ;
+Ind+Pres+3Sg:sta		# ;
+Ind+Pres+1Pl:stiamo	# ;
+Ind+Pres+2Pl:state	# ;
+Ind+Pres+3Pl:stanno	# ;

+Ind+Past:st	Indicative_Imperfect_Are ;

+Ind+AbsPast+1Sg:stetti	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+2Sg:stesti	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+3Sg:stette	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+1Pl:stemmo	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+2Pl:steste	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+3Pl:stettero	# ;

+Ind+Fut+1Sg:starò	# ;
+Ind+Fut+2Sg:starai	# ;
+Ind+Fut+3Sg:starà	# ;
+Ind+Fut+1Pl:staremo	# ;
+Ind+Fut+2Pl:starete	# ;
+Ind+Fut+3Pl:staranno	# ;

+Sub+Pres+1Sg:stia	# ;
+Sub+Pres+2Sg:stia	# ;
+Sub+Pres+3Sg:stia	# ;
+Sub+Pres+1Pl:stiamo	# ;	
+Sub+Pres+2Pl:stiate	# ;
+Sub+Pres+3Pl:stiano	# ;

+Sub+Past+1Sg:stessi		# ;
+Sub+Past+2Sg:stessi		# ;
+Sub+Past+3Sg:stesse		# ;
+Sub+Past+1Pl:stessimo	# ;
+Sub+Past+2Pl:steste		# ;
+Sub+Past+3Pl:stessero	# ;

+Cond+Pres+1Sg:starei			# ;
+Cond+Pres+2Sg:staresti		# ;
+Cond+Pres+3Sg:starebbe		# ;
+Cond+Pres+1Pl:staremmo		# ;
+Cond+Pres+2Pl:stareste		# ;
+Cond+Pres+3Pl:starebbero		# ;
+Part:st			Participle_Are ;
+Ger:stando							# ;
+Inf:stare							# ;



LEXICON Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Stems    ! Verbs inflected like 'fare'
artefare:arte					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
assuefare:assue					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
contraffare:contraf				Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
disassuefare:disassue			Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
disfare:dis						Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
dissuefare:dissue				Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
fare:							Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
forfare:for						Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
liquefare:liquef				Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
malfare:mal						Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
mansuefare:mansue				Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
misfare:mis						Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
prefare:pre						Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
putrefare:putre					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
rarefare:rare					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
rifare:ri						Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
satisfare:satis					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
sfare:s							Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
soddisfare:soddis				Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
sopraffare:sopraf				Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
strafare:stra					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
stupefare:stupe					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
tepefare:tepe					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
torrefare:torre					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;
tumefare:tume					Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ;



LEXICON Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Endings ! Verbs inflected like 'fare'
+Ind+Pres+1Sg:faccio		# ;
+Ind+Pres+1Sg:fo		# ;
+Ind+Pres+2Sg:fai			# ;
+Ind+Pres+3Sg:fa			# ;
+Ind+Pres+1Pl:facciamo	# ;
+Ind+Pres+2Pl:fate		# ;
+Ind+Pres+3Pl:fanno		# ;

+Ind+Past:fac	Indicative_Imperfect_Ere ;

+Ind+AbsPast+1Sg:feci		# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+2Sg:facesti	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+3Sg:fece		# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+1Pl:facemmo	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+2Pl:faceste	# ;
+Ind+AbsPast+3Pl:fecero		# ;

+Ind+Fut+1Sg:farò		# ;
+Ind+Fut+2Sg:farai		# ;
+Ind+Fut+3Sg:farà		# ;
+Ind+Fut+1Pl:faremo		# ;
+Ind+Fut+2Pl:farete		# ;
+Ind+Fut+3Pl:faranno	# ;

+Sub+Pres:facci		Subjunctive_Present_Ere_Ire ;
+Sub+Past:fac		Subjunctive_Imperfect_Ere ;

+Cond+Pres+1Sg:farei			# ;
+Cond+Pres+2Sg:faresti			# ;
+Cond+Pres+3Sg:farebbe			# ;
+Cond+Pres+1Pl:faremmo			# ;
+Cond+Pres+2Pl:fareste			# ;
+Cond+Pres+3Pl:farebbero		# ;
+Part:fat			Participle_Ere_Ire_Isc ;
+Ger:facendo					# ;
+Inf:fare						# ;


LEXICON Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ire
Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ire_Group1_Stems ; ! Irregular verbs that inflect like 'venire'
Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ire_Group2_Stems ; ! Irregular verbs that inflect like 'morire'

LEXICON Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere
Highly_Irregular_Forms_Ere_Group1_Stems ; ! Irregular verbs that inflect like 'fare'
